Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB136.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 186A.035 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except for vehicles described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, all motor vehicles, including
motorcycles, with a gross vehicular weight of ten thousand (10,000) pounds or less, first registered, or
for which the registration is renewed, shall be placed in a system of year-round registration based upon
the birth date of the owner, in order to distribute the work of registering motor vehicles as uniformly as
practicable throughout the twelve (12) months of the year.
(b) Owners of the following motor vehicles may elect to register these vehicles on an annual registration
schedule of April 1 to March 31:
1. Farm vehicles registered under KRS 186.050(4); or
2. Motor vehicles with a gross vehicular weight of ten thousand (10,000) pounds or less that are
owned by a business.
(2) (a) If the owner of a motor vehicle is other than an individual, the month in which the owning entity came
into being shall be used for purposes of this section.
(b) Except for motor vehicles jointly owned by spouses under paragraph (c) of this subsection, if a motor
vehicle is jointly owned:
1. One (1) of the owners, who is a resident of Kentucky, shall be identified as the designated owner;
2. The designated owner shall indicate to the county clerk his or her birth date to be used for
purposes of this section; and
3. If the circumstances of ownership change and the designated owner is no longer an owner of the
motor vehicle or no longer a resident of Kentucky, another owner may title the motor vehicle in
his or her name if that owner is a resident of Kentucky. If none of the remaining owners are a
resident of Kentucky, one (1) of the owners shall title the vehicle in that owner's state of
residence.
(c) If a motor vehicle is jointly owned by a married couple, the ownership shall exist as a joint tenancy with
right of survivorship, unless the registration expressly states to the contrary and gives an alternative
specific status. One (1) of the owners shall indicate to the county clerk his or her birth date to be used
for purposes of this section. Upon the death of one (1) of the spouses, the jointly-owned vehicle shall
transfer to the surviving spouse free from payment of any state-required transfer fees. The surviving
spouse shall include a copy of the death certificate with the application for a new title.
(d) A certificate of title:
1. May bear the connector "AND" to designate joint ownership. If the "AND" connector is used,
the signatures of all owners shall be required to transfer the certificate of title;
2. May bear the connector "OR" to designate joint ownership. If the "OR" connector is used,
the signature of only one (1) owner shall be required to transfer the certificate of title; and
3. Shall not bear the connector "AND/OR" to designate joint ownership. If a title produced prior
to the effective date of this Act bears the connector "AND/OR," the cabinet and the county
clerk shall follow the procedures in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph in transferring the
certificate of title, unless directed otherwise by a court.
(3) The certificate of registration and license plate issued for a motor vehicle first registered, renewed, or titled in
this state shall be valid until the expiration date on the registration receipt, unless revoked in accordance with
KRS 186A.040 or canceled by the cabinet in accordance with KRS Chapter 186 or this chapter. Any
transaction relating to registration or registration renewal which would cause an unexpired Kentucky motor
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
vehicle license plate to be surrendered shall have that unexpired fee prorated or credited against any additional
fee required by a subsequent registration.
(4) Except for vehicles registered under subsection (1)(b) of this section, KRS 186.041, 186.042, and 186.162 that
have a specified, universal expiration date, after a motor vehicle has been initially placed in the system of year-
round registration, the owner shall renew the registration annually during the owner's birth month, either by
making application to the county clerk or on the cabinet's website, and paying the fee required for twelve (12)
consecutive months of registration, which shall take effect on the first day of the month succeeding the owner's
birth month and shall expire on the last day of the owner's next birth month. The county clerk shall collect the
fees set forth in KRS 186.040(1) and (6) for each renewal.
(5) At least forty-five (45) days prior to the expiration of the registration of any motor vehicle previously
registered in the Commonwealth as provided by subsection (1) of this section, the owner of the vehicle shall be
notified by mail or email on the same notice required by KRS 134.805(5) of the date of expiration. Nonreceipt
of the notice required by this subsection shall not constitute a defense to any registration-related offense.
(6) Any owner who fails to renew the registration of a motor vehicle during the month in which the previous
registration expired shall, if he or she applies for renewal of the registration in some later month, pay the same
fees that would have been required if the registration had been renewed in the month which the previous
registration expired, and, if applicable, the reinstatement fee for a cancelled registration required under KRS
186.040.
(7) Fees which must be prorated in carrying out the intent of this section shall be prorated on the basis of twelfths
of the annual registration fee. Any vehicle which is registered at any time during a month shall pay the fee
required for that whole month plus any additional months of registration purchased consistent with the intent
of the section.
(8) The county clerk shall ensure that the certificate of registration issued to an owner displays the month and year
in which the registration period begins and the month and year of its expiration, and shall issue to the owner a
decal or decals corresponding to the month and year of expiration shown in the certificate of registration which
shall be placed upon the corresponding license plate by the owner in the manner required by administrative
regulations of the Department of Vehicle Regulation.
Section 2. KRS 186A.115 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the owner of every vehicle brought into this state and
required to be titled in this state shall, before submitting his or her application for title to the county
clerk, have the vehicle together with his or her application for title and its supporting documents
inspected by a certified inspector in the county in which the application for title is to be submitted to the
county clerk.
(b) An owner of a military surplus vehicle seeking title in this state shall, before submitting his or her
application for title to the county clerk, have the vehicle together with his or her application for title and
its supporting documents inspected by a certified inspector in the county in which the application for
title is to be submitted to the county clerk.
(2) For inspections under this section:
(a) The certified inspector shall be certified through the Department of Vehicle Regulation following
requirements set forth by the department by regulation and shall be designated by the county sheriff if
the inspector is a current member of his or her office or a special inspector appointed pursuant to KRS
70.030. The certified inspector will be held responsible for all certifications required pursuant to this
chapter and will be liable for any and all penalties prescribed in this chapter, and shall be available
during regular office hours at any and all offices and branches that issue applications for titles;
(b) There shall be a fee for this certification, payable to the sheriff's office, and the fee shall be retained by
the sheriff's office for official expenses of the office upon completion of certification, in the amount of:
1. Thirty dollars ($30) for a motor vehicle dealer that qualifies to have an employee appointed as a
special inspector under paragraph (d) of this subsection;
2. Fifteen dollars ($15) for a motor vehicle dealer that does not qualify to have an employee
appointed as a special inspector under paragraph (d) of this subsection; or
3. Fifteen dollars ($15) for an individual person;

CHAPTER 95 3
(c) There shall be an additional fee of twenty dollars ($20) per trip when it becomes necessary for the
certified inspector to travel to the site of the vehicle rather than bringing the vehicle to the sheriff's
inspection area;
(d) A sheriff may appoint up to two (2) employees of a motor vehicle dealer that is licensed under KRS
Chapter 190 and doing business in the sheriff's county as special inspectors if the motor vehicle dealer
is:
1. A new motor vehicle dealer; or
2. A used motor vehicle dealer that has sold an average of one hundred (100) or more motor
vehicles per month in the preceding twelve (12) months;
(e) A special inspector appointed under paragraph (d) of this subsection is only authorized to perform
motor vehicle inspections and complete certified inspection forms under this section for vehicles
purchased by that dealership for resale and shall have his or her special inspector status revoked if he or
she is no longer an active employee of that dealership; and
(f) An inspection conducted in one (1) county within the Commonwealth of Kentucky under this
subsection, and the fees paid for that inspection under this subsection, shall be honored by the certified
inspector, sheriff, and county clerk in all other counties within this state. A second inspection shall not
be required and additional fees shall not be required.
(3) The Transportation Cabinet may require that modifications be made to a military surplus vehicle. Any
modifications required by the cabinet under this section shall be made to the military surplus vehicle prior to
its inspection.
(4) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to
implement the provisions of subsections (1)(b) and (3) of this section, including but not limited to vehicle
modification requirements and the creation of a separate electronic inspection form. The Transportation
Cabinet shall note that military vehicles were originally manufactured under the federally mandated
requirements set forth in 49 C.F.R. sec. 571.7 and shall only require these vehicles to meet applicable federal
motor vehicle safety standards.
(5) The following vehicles are excluded from the requirement of inspection by a certified inspector prior to titling
in this state:
(a) New motor vehicles sold by a dealer licensed in this state;
(b) Vehicles required to be registered in this state by reason of lack of a reciprocity agreement with another
state and for which a nonnegotiable registration document is to be issued;
(c) Motor vehicles operated by a motor carrier under a nonnegotiable certificate or permit issued by the
Department of Vehicle Regulation;
(d) Motor vehicles owned by servicemen or servicewomen who are residents of Kentucky stationed outside
of Kentucky may be inspected by the post provost or similar officer of the camp, post, or station. The
post provost or similar officer shall submit an affidavit stating the name of the owner, the identification
or serial number, the make, body style, current license or title number, if any, and state in which
currently registered or titled, if any, of the motor vehicle;
(e) Motor vehicles purchased in another state by persons who are residents of Kentucky but are temporarily
residing out of state for at least thirty (30) days, but not longer than nine (9) months, may after the
purchase of the vehicle be inspected by the state police, a local law enforcement agency, or the vehicle
inspection program of another state. If an inspector in another state examines a vehicle under this
paragraph, the purchaser may request the inspector to complete an affidavit stating the name of the
owner, the vehicle identification number, the vehicle make and body style, the current state of
registration, if any, and the current vehicle license or title number, if any. The Transportation Cabinet
shall create an affidavit form containing at a minimum this information and shall post the form on the
cabinet's internet website. A person using an inspector in another state under this paragraph shall
comply with all requirements of that state's inspection program, including payment of fees charged in
that state. A person registering a motor vehicle for the first time in Kentucky under this paragraph shall
transmit the application for registration, all supporting documentation, and payment for registration and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
usage tax to the county clerk of the county in which the person resides, and upon receipt of the
appropriate documentation, the county clerk shall register the vehicle; and
(f) Motor vehicles no longer located in Kentucky but which require inspection in order to issue a corrected
Kentucky title due to error in vehicle identification or serial number may be inspected by an inspector
authorized to inspect vehicle identification or serial number by the laws of the state or foreign country
where application for a new title has been submitted.
(6) When presented to a certified inspector for inspection and to a county clerk for processing, the owner's
application for a first certificate of registration or title in his or her name shall be accompanied by a current
operator's license from Kentucky or another state and one (1) of the following documents as applicable:
(a) If the vehicle is a new vehicle not previously registered in this state, the properly assigned
manufacturer's statement of origin for the vehicle for which registration or title is sought;
(b) If the vehicle was last registered in this state, and is a vehicle for which a title is not required in this
state, a certificate of registration, or if the vehicle is one for which a certificate of title is required in this
state, a properly assigned certificate of title;
(c) If the vehicle was last previously titled in another state, a properly assigned certificate of title;
(d) If the application refers to a vehicle previously registered in another country, the documents of that
country establishing ownership of the vehicle;
(e) If the application refers to a vehicle last previously registered in another country by a person on active
duty in the Armed Forces of the United States, the county clerk may accept on behalf of the Department
of Vehicle Regulation evidence of ownership provided the applicant by the United States Department of
Defense; and
(f) Except as provided in KRS 186A.072(2)(c) governing custom-built motorcycles, if the application
relates to a vehicle which has been specially constructed or reconstructed, that fact shall be stated in the
application, and the application shall be accompanied by the documents specified by administrative
regulations of the Department of Vehicle Regulation.
(7) When requested to inspect a vehicle pursuant to this section, the certified inspector shall personally and
physically inspect the vehicle, when registration or title is sought in this state, on the following points:
(a) He or she shall compare the vehicle identification number as appearing on both the vehicle
identification number plate, and the federal safety standards label of the vehicle which is sought to be
registered or titled, with the corresponding number inscribed on the application, and its supporting
documentation, and ensure that the vehicle identification number appearing at each described location
appears legitimate and that they are consistent with each other;
(b) He or she shall examine the primary odometer of the vehicle and electronically record the reading in the
space provided in the inspection section of the application;
(c) After exercising due diligence in inspecting the vehicle and its supporting documentation, and finding
that they appear to be in order, the certified inspector shall execute the electronic certificate of
inspection according to its terms by electronically inputting in the spaces provided his or her first name,
middle initial, and last name, certified inspector number, his or her title; the name of the county in
which he or she serves; and the telephone number including the telephone area code of his or her
agency, and enter the month, day, and year in which his or her inspection was made, certifying under
penalty of forgery in the second degree the character, accuracy, and date of his or her inspection; and
(d) A certified inspector number shall not be subject to an open records request under KRS 61.870 to
61.884 unless otherwise required by a court order.
(8) The certified inspector shall refrain from executing the certificate of inspection if:
(a) He or she has not personally and physically inspected the vehicle in accordance with this section;
(b) He or she has reason to believe that the vehicle displays an unlawfully altered vehicle identification
number;
(c) The application and any of its copies are illegible or otherwise improperly executed, or contain
information reasonably believed to be inaccurate or fraudulent;

CHAPTER 95 5
(d) The documentation required in support of any application is not present, or not consistent with the
vehicle and the owner's application or appears fraudulent; or
(e) He or she has probable cause to believe the vehicle is stolen.
(9) (a) Inspections on motor vehicles that meet the definition of a "historic vehicle" under KRS 186.043(2) and
are brought into this state shall be limited to verification of the vehicle identification number with
supporting documentation for purposes of titling.
(b) Inspections on motor vehicles that meet the definition of a classic motor vehicle project as set forth in
KRS 186A.510 shall be limited to verification of the vehicle identification number with supporting
documentation for purposes of issuing a classic motor vehicle project certificate of title under KRS
186A.535(1).
(10) The electronic certificate of inspection shall not be handled by any person or persons other than those
designated individuals within the offices of the sheriff, county clerk, or other state office.
(11) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to
implement the provisions of this section, including but not limited to special inspectors classified as dealer
inspectors only and the creation of an electronic certified vehicle inspection form and receipt.
Section 3. KRS 186A.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except for applications for title or salvage title using the electronic title application and registration
system established under KRS 186A.017, application for a first certificate of registration or title and
plate shall be made by the owner to the county clerk of the county in which the owner resides, except
that, if a vehicle is purchased from:
1.[(a)] A dealer other than in the county in which the purchaser for use resides, the purchaser, or the
dealer on behalf of the purchaser, may make application for registration to the county clerk in
either the county in which the purchaser resides, or in the county in which the dealer's principal
place of business is located; or
2.[(b)] An individual who resides in a county in which the purchaser does not reside, application for
registration may be made to the county clerk in either the county where the seller resides or the
purchaser resides.
(b) The county clerk shall ensure that all applications and required supporting documents are complete.
(c) An application received by a county clerk shall be processed and sent to the cabinet within three (3)
business days of receipt.
(2) (a) When purchaser of a vehicle upon which a lien is to be recorded is a resident of a county other than that
of the dealer, the application for registration or title may be made to the county clerk in either county.
The lien must be recorded in the county of the purchaser's residence.
(b) If vehicle application for registration or title is presented to the county clerk of dealer's location rather
than purchaser's residence, the clerk shall process documents in a manner similar to that of any
application, with the exception that the AVIS system shall be programmed in a manner that the title
shall not be issued from Frankfort until the lien information has been entered by the county clerk of the
purchaser's residence.
(3) (a) A new vehicle, when first registered or titled in this state, shall be registered or titled in the name of the
first owner for use rather than in the name of a dealer who held the vehicle for sale.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a used vehicle not previously registered or titled in this
state shall be registered or titled in the name of the first owner for use rather than in the name of a
dealer who held the vehicle for resale.
(4) If the owner of a vehicle required to be registered or titled in this state does not reside in the Commonwealth,
the vehicle shall be registered or titled with the county clerk of the county in which the vehicle is principally
operated.
(5) The Transportation Cabinet shall not require a member of the Armed Forces who is stationed in the
Commonwealth to obtain a Kentucky operator's license in order to register a motor vehicle in the
Commonwealth.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(6) If the owner of a vehicle is other than an individual and resides in the Commonwealth, the vehicle shall be
registered or titled with the county clerk in either the county in which the owner resides or in the county in
which the vehicle is principally operated.
Section 4. KRS 186A.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Vehicle Regulation is directed to develop, in cooperation with county clerks, auto dealers,
and the Department of Revenue, Department of Insurance, and Department of Kentucky State Police, the
forms required to record all information pertinent to the registration, titling, and taxation of a vehicle.
(2) The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall make every effort to minimize and reduce the amount of
paperwork required to apply for, or transfer, a vehicle title. When possible, the title document itself shall be
used as the primary form used to effect a transfer of vehicle ownership. The title document shall contain space
exclusively reserved for a minimum of two (2) dealer assignments.
(3) When no in-state title exists, forms shall be designed by the department that require only the appropriate and
essential information to effect the application for title.
(4) (a) The department shall constantly review the information needs of government agencies and other
organizations with the goal of reducing or eliminating unnecessary documentation. Information being
sought for application for title relevant to, but not limited to, vehicle identification, owner, buyer, usage
tax, county clerk, or inspector shall be set forth by the cabinet in such a way as to promote flexibility in
reaching this goal.
(b) Subject to the limitations of paragraph (c) of this subsection, an applicant for a motor vehicle title shall
be required to provide his or her Kentucky operator's license number, Kentucky personal identification
card number, or Social Security number as part of the application process.
(c) If a motor vehicle is jointly owned, one (1) of the owners, who is a resident of Kentucky, shall be
identified as the designated owner, and only the designated owner shall be required to provide his or her
Kentucky operator's license number, Kentucky personal identification card number, or Social Security
number as part of the application process.
(d) Any vehicle owned by a business that is licensed by the Secretary of State shall be titled and registered
using a Federal Employer Identification Number.
(e) An applicant for a motor vehicle registration shall be required to provide his or her Kentucky
operator's license or Social Security number as part of the application process.
(f) If a motor vehicle has situs and is principally operated in Kentucky, and the owner does not reside in
the Commonwealth, the motor vehicle shall be registered with the owner's Social Security number
and out-of-state operator's license number.
(5) The use of an electronic medium shall be employed so that forms can be printed by the automated system.
Existing statutory language in this chapter and KRS Chapter 186 pertaining to application, signature, forms, or
application transfer record may be construed to be electronic in nature at the discretion of the cabinet as
provided for by administrative regulation.
(6) Any person who knowingly enters, or attests to the entry of, false or erroneous information in pursuit of a
certificate of title shall be guilty of forgery in the second degree.
Section 5. KRS 186A.170 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall:
(a) Within five (5) working days following receipt by it of an application for a certificate of title in proper
form, process the application and its supporting documents in the manner provided in this section, and
unless it finds discrepancies with respect to it or its supporting documents, issue a certificate of title in
the name of the owner and send it postpaid to such owner;
(b) Within forty-eight (48) hours following electronic notification by a county clerk's office of an
application for a certificate of title, issue a speed title which shall be held for pickup or returned to the
owner by mail. The clerk shall take the application for title and process the appropriate paperwork as
provided for in this chapter. Subject to the limitations outlined in paragraph (c) of this subsection, the
department may provide by administrative regulation for exceptions to the speed title procedure; and

CHAPTER 95 7
(c) Not exempt vehicles with salvage and rebuilt titles from the speed title procedures, but may extend the
processing time on salvage and rebuilt title applications for which the documentation is complete and
accurate for up to:
1. Fifteen (15) business days for rebuilt vehicles that have been branded as unrebuildable in another
state under KRS 186A.530(5) and (6); and
2. Five (5) business days for all other salvage and rebuilt vehicles.
(2) Upon receiving an application packet from a county clerk, the[ application receipt clerk of the] Department of
Vehicle Regulation title examiner shall verify that the application form and its supporting documents are
complete.[:
(a) Cause the date and time of receipt to be stamped on both the department's copy and the
acknowledgment copy of the application transmittal record and accompanying documents;
(b) Cause at least duplicate sets of images to be made of each transmittal record application and supporting
document by a means that will provide rapid, selective, automated retrieval of individual document
images by appropriate indexing methods or keys; and
(c) Compare the application transmittal record with the documents accompanying it and, if all applications
shown upon the record are accompanying the record, endorse the department's copy of the transmittal
record and the acknowledgment copy, and forward the acknowledgment copy to the clerk who issued
it.]
(3) In the event there is a discrepancy between the application form and the supporting documents[transmittal
record and the application attached to it], the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall stop the application
process[note the discrepancy upon the department's copy and the acknowledgment copy], and [shall ]promptly
contact the issuing clerk to[and] resolve the discrepancy. After resolving the discrepancy, the clerk shall
resubmit the application for further review and approval[department shall note the nature of the disposition
of the discrepancy and endorse the respective copies and forward the acknowledgment copy with the
discrepancy disposition noted thereon to the issuing clerk].
(4) [After executing the acknowledgment of receipt of applications, ]The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall
carry out the following action with respect to each application:
(a) Examine the owner's application for legibility and proper execution, presence of required information,
including required supporting documents, and the presence of required signatures. The Department of
Vehicle Regulation shall ensure also that the required supporting documents are consistent in pertinent
part with the information shown on the owner's application;
(b) The documents supporting an owner's application shall be examined as to authenticity and to determine
if fraudulent alteration has occurred;
(c) Ensure that the vehicle identification number of the subject vehicle is apparently legitimate;
(d) Ensure that the vehicle identification number and any other appropriate information with respect to a
vehicle for which a certificate of title has been applied for is compared against the National Crime
Information Center (NCIC) computerized listings of vehicles reported stolen, unless NCIC is not
operational and the department has official notification that it is not expected to be operational within
four (4) working days following the day on which an application for a certificate of title is received by
it; and
(e) Compare the computer-produced certificate of title for consistency with the owner's application and
supporting documents.
(5) [When the title application has been completed, and the application examiner at each significant stage has
indicated, by placing his or her unique symbol upon the application in the space provided thereon, that an
application has passed the required examinations, the application shall be examined by a title examination
certifier.
(6) ]The title application examiner[certifier] shall ensure that each application has received the required
examinations as indicated by the presence of each required approval via the application[examiner's symbol].
Upon satisfying himself or herself that an application has passed the required examinations, the title
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
examination certifier shall place his or her approval in KAVIS[unique symbol] together with the date upon the
application.
(6)[(7)] The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall withhold issuance of a title, until its questions are resolved
to its satisfaction, when it finds material discrepancies or has information giving probable cause to believe:
(a) That an applicant is not the lawful owner of a vehicle for which he or she seeks a title;
(b) His or her application is not in order;
(c) The documentation supporting an application is insufficient or fraudulent;
(d) The vehicle has an illegitimate vehicle identification number;
(e) The vehicle is stolen; or
(f) That the computer-produced certificate of title is not consistent with the owner's application.
(7)[(8)] In the case of multiple owners, the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall require only two (2) primary
owners' names to be printed on the certificate of title. Upon submission of the title application, if more than
two (2) owners are listed, the primary owners shall be determined by the title applicants. In such instances, the
certificate of the title shall note that there are more than two (2) owners. The names of all title applicants shall
be documented in AVIS.
(8)[(9)] When the Department of Vehicle Regulation finds that a certificate of title should be issued for a
vehicle, the endorsement of the commissioner of the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall be engrossed
upon the certificate of title following a preprinted statement which shall read: I certify that the Department of
Vehicle Regulation has exercised due diligence in examining an application for a certificate of title for the
above-described vehicle, and to the best of our knowledge and belief, the applicant whose name appears above
is the lawful owner of the apparently legitimate vehicle described herein. --------------- (signature),
commissioner, Department of Vehicle Regulation, Kentucky Transportation Cabinet.
Section 6. KRS 186A.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section and in KRS 355.9-311(4), the perfection of a security
interest in any property for which has been issued a Kentucky certificate of title shall be by notation on the
certificate of title which shall be deemed to have occurred when the provisions of subsection (3) of this section
have been complied with. Discharge of a security interest shall be by notation on the certificate of title.
Notation shall be made by the entry of information required by subsection (9) of this section into the
Automated Vehicle Information System. The notation of the security interest on the certificate of title shall be
in accordance with this chapter and shall remain effective from the date on which the security interest is noted
on the certificate of title for a period of ten (10) years, or, in the case of a manufactured home, for a period of
thirty (30) years, or until discharged under this chapter and KRS Chapter 186. The filing of a continuation
statement within the six (6) months preceding the expiration of the initial period of a notation's effectiveness
extends the expiration date for five (5) additional years, commencing on the day the notation would have
expired in the absence of the filing. Succeeding continuation statements may be filed in the same manner to
continue the effectiveness of the initial notation.
(2) A motor vehicle dealer, a secured party or its representative, an assignee of a retail installment contract lender,
the cabinet, or a county clerk shall rely on a county of residence designated by the debtor on any approved,
notarized state form utilized in lien titling or the title transfer process signed by the debtor. Reliance on the
foregoing by the motor vehicle dealer, secured parties, cabinet, and county clerk shall relieve those persons
from liability to any third party claiming failure to comply with this section.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the notation of security interests relating to property
required to be titled under this chapter in Kentucky through the cabinet shall be done in the office of a county
clerk. The notation of a security interest shall reflect the county in which the debtor resides as determined by
subsections (2) and (4) of this section. The security interest shall be deemed to be noted on the certificate of
title and perfected, or deemed perfected at the time the security interest attaches as provided in KRS 355.9-
203, if in compliance with KRS 186A.195(8)[(7)], when a title lien statement:
(a) Is received by the county clerk, together with the required fees;
(b) Describes the titled vehicle, or vehicle to be titled, by year, model, make, and vehicle identification
number;

CHAPTER 95 9
(c) Provides the name of the secured party, or a representative of the secured party, together with the
additional information about the secured party required by subsection (9) of this section with reasonable
particularity; and
(d) Includes the date and time-stamped entry of the notation of the security interest by the county clerk of
the required information in the Automated Vehicle Information System (AVIS), or its successor title
processing system maintained by the Division of Motor Vehicle Licensing of the Transportation
Cabinet.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, if the debtor is other than a natural person, the following
provisions govern the determination of the county of the debtor's residence:
(a) A partnership shall be deemed a resident of the county in which its principal place of business in this
state is located. If the debtor does not have a place of business in this state, then the debtor shall be
deemed a nonresident for purposes of filing in this state;
(b) A limited partnership organized under KRS Chapter 362 or as defined in KRS 362.2-102(14) shall be
deemed a resident of the county in which its principal place of business is located, as set forth in its
certificate of limited partnership or most recent amendment thereto filed pursuant to KRS Chapter 362
or 362.2-202. If the office is not located in this state, the debtor shall be deemed a nonresident for
purposes of filing in this state;
(c) A limited partnership not organized under the laws of this state and authorized to do business in this
state shall be deemed a resident of the county in which the office of its process agent is located, as set
forth in the designation or most recent amendment thereto filed with the Secretary of State of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(d) A corporation organized under KRS Chapter 271B, 273, or 274 or a limited liability company organized
under KRS Chapter 275 shall be deemed a resident of the county in which its registered office is
located, as set forth in its most recent corporate filing with the Secretary of State which officially
designates its current registered office;
(e) A corporation not organized under the laws of this state, but authorized to transact or do business in this
state under KRS Chapter 271B, 273, or 274, or a limited liability company not organized under the laws
of this state, but authorized to transact business in this state under KRS Chapter 275, shall be deemed a
resident of the county in which its registered office is located, as set forth in its most recent filing with
the Secretary of State which officially designates its current registered office;
(f) A cooperative corporation or association organized under KRS Chapter 272 shall be deemed a resident
of the county in which its principal business is transacted, as set forth in its articles of incorporation or
most recent amendment thereto filed with the Secretary of State of the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(g) A cooperative corporation organized under KRS Chapter 279 shall be deemed a resident of the county
in which its principal office is located, as set forth in its articles of incorporation or most recent
amendment thereto filed with the Secretary of State of the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(h) A business trust organized under KRS Chapter 386 shall be deemed a resident of the county in which its
principal place of business is located, as evidenced by the recordation of its declaration of trust in that
county pursuant to KRS Chapter 386;
(i) A credit union organized under Subtitle 6 of KRS Chapter 286 shall be deemed a resident of the county
in which its principal place of business is located, as set forth in its articles of incorporation or most
recent amendment thereto filed with the Secretary of State of the Commonwealth of Kentucky; and
(j) Any other organization defined in KRS 355.1-201 shall be deemed a resident of the county in which its
principal place of business in this state is located, except that any limited liability company, limited
liability partnership, limited partnership, or corporation not organized under the laws of this state and
not authorized to transact or do business in this state shall be deemed a nonresident for purposes of
filing in this state. If the organization does not have a place of business in this state, then it shall be
deemed a nonresident for purposes of filing in this state.
If the debtor does not reside in the Commonwealth, the notation of the security interest shall be done in the
office of the county clerk in which the property is principally situated or operated. Notwithstanding the
existence of any filed financing statement under the provisions of KRS Chapter 355 relating to any property
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
registered or titled in Kentucky, the sole means of perfecting and discharging a security interest in property for
which a certificate of title is required by this chapter is by notation on the property's certificate of title under
the provisions of this chapter or in accordance with the provisions of KRS 186.045(3). In other respects the
security interest is governed by the provisions of KRS Chapter 355.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, before ownership of property subject to a lien evidenced
by notation on the certificate of title may be transferred, the transferor shall obtain the release of the prior liens
in his or her name against the property being transferred. Once a security interest has been noted on the
owner's title, a subsequent title shall not be issued by any county clerk free of the notation unless it has been
noted in the system of record established under KRS 186A.195 that the security interest has been discharged.
If this requirement is met, information relating to any security interest shown on the title as having been
discharged may be omitted from the title to be issued by the clerk. If information relating to the discharge of a
security interest is presented to a clerk under the provisions of KRS 186.045(3), the clerk shall discharge the
security interest and remove the lien information from AVIS.
(6) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (5) of this section, a county clerk shall, following inspection of the vehicle
by the sheriff, to determine that the vehicle has not been stolen, issue a new ownership document to a vehicle,
clear of all prior liens, to a person after he or she provides to the county clerk an affidavit devised by the
Transportation Cabinet and completed by the person. The ownership document presented as a result of this
affidavit shall be in accordance with subsection (7) of this section. In the affidavit, the affiant shall attest that:
(a) The affiant or the agent of the affiant possesses the vehicle;
(b) Before he or she provided the notices required by paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection:
1. A debt on the vehicle has been owed him or her for more than thirty (30) days;
2. Within thirty (30) days of payment of damages by an insurance company and receipt by the
current owner of the motor vehicle or lienholder of damages pursuant to a claim settlement
which required transfer of the vehicle to the insurance company, the insurance company has been
unable to obtain:
a. A properly endorsed certificate of title on the vehicle from the current owner; and
b. If applicable, any lien satisfactions; or
3. a. The vehicle was voluntarily towed or transported pursuant to a request of the current
owner or an insurance company that a motor vehicle dealer, licensed as a used motor
vehicle dealer and motor vehicle auction dealer, take possession of and store the motor
vehicle in the regular course of business; and
b. Within forty-five (45) days of taking possession of the motor vehicle, the motor vehicle
dealer has not been paid storage fees by the current owner or lienholder and has not been
provided both a properly endorsed certificate of title and if applicable, any lien
satisfactions;
(c) More than thirty (30) days before presenting the affidavit to the county clerk, the affiant attempted to
notify the owner of the vehicle and all known lienholders, including those noted on the title, by certified
mail, return receipt requested, or by a nationally recognized courier service, of his or her name, address,
and telephone number as well as his or her intention to obtain a new title or salvage title, as applicable,
clear of all prior liens, unless the owner or a lienholder objects in writing;
(d) More than fourteen (14) days before presenting the affidavit to the county clerk, the affiant had
published a legal notice stating his or her intention to obtain title to the vehicle. The legal notice
appeared at least twice in a seven (7) day period in a newspaper with circulation in the county. The
legal notice stated:
1. The affiant's name, address, and telephone number;
2. The owner's name;
3. The names of all known lienholders, including those noted on the title;
4. The vehicle's make, model, and year; and
5. The affiant's intention to obtain title to the vehicle unless the owner or a lienholder objects in
writing within fourteen (14) days after the last publication of the legal notice; and

CHAPTER 95 11
(e) Neither the owner nor a lienholder has objected in writing to the affiant's right to obtain title to the
vehicle.
(7) (a) If subsection (6)(b)1. of this section applies, the new ownership document shall be a title.
(b) If subsection (6)(b)2. or 3. of this section applies, the new ownership document shall be a salvage title if
the vehicle meets the requirements for a salvage title as stated in KRS 186A.520(1)(a).
(c) If subsection (6)(b)2. or 3. of this section applies and the vehicle does not meet the requirements for a
salvage title as stated in KRS 186A.520(1)(a), the new ownership document shall be a title.
(8) No more than two (2) active security interests may be noted upon a certificate of title.
(9) In noting a security interest upon a certificate of title, the county clerk shall ensure that the certificate of title
bears the lienholder's name, mailing address and zip code, the date the lien was noted, the notation number,
and the county in which the security interest was noted. The clerk shall obtain the information required by this
subsection for notation upon the certificate of title from the title lien statement described in KRS 186A.195.
(10) For all the costs incurred in the notation and discharge of a security interest on the certificate of title, the
county clerk shall receive the fee prescribed by KRS 64.012. The fee prescribed by this subsection shall be
paid at the time of submittal of the title lien statement described in KRS 186A.195.
(11) A copy of the application, certified by the county clerk, indicating the lien will be noted on the certificate of
title shall be forwarded to the lienholder.
(12) (a) Any lien or security interest filed under this chapter may be electronically transmitted to the cabinet
through the electronic title application and registration system.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, KRS 186A.015, and 186A.074 that require a lien to be
noted on the face of the title, if there are one (1) or more liens on a motor vehicle, the cabinet may
electronically notify the first lienholder of any additional liens.
(c) Subsequent lien satisfactions may be electronically transmitted to the cabinet and shall include the
name and address of the person satisfying the lien.
(d) When liens and lien satisfactions are electronically transmitted, a clean certificate of title shall not be
issued until the last lien is satisfied.
(e) A duly certified copy of the cabinet's electronic record of the lien shall be admissible in any civil,
criminal, or administrative proceedings in this state as evidence of the existence of the lien.
(13) If a security interest expires without being renewed, the cabinet shall remove the lien from the certificate of
title in the AVIS system.
Section 7. KRS 186A.195 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, submission of a title lien statement refers to the presentation of a title lien statement,
along with the fees required under KRS 64.012(1)(b), to the cabinet through any county clerk's office in the
Commonwealth.
(2) A title lien statement bearing an electronic signature, as defined in KRS 369.102, shall be accepted in
accordance with KRS 369.107 and shall not require notarization.
(3) Upon submission of a title lien statement, the county clerk shall use the information on the form to note the
security interest on the certificate of title in accordance with KRS 186A.190(9). Title lien statements may be
made available to the general public. However, public availability of a title lien statement shall not be
considered necessary or effective to perfect a security interest in property required to be registered or titled in
accordance with this chapter.
(4)[(3)] (a) If the submission of a title lien statement accompanies the application for first title of any
property in the name of an owner, the county clerk shall enter the information required by KRS
186A.190(9) into the system of record so as to allow the cabinet to:
1. Use the system of record as a centralized, statewide repository for lien filings; and
2. Produce a certificate of title bearing the information designated by KRS 186A.190(9), as well as
any other information required by the cabinet.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) After the information has been entered, the county clerk shall produce a certificate of registration, if
required.
(5)[(4)] (a) If the form prescribed by KRS 186A.060 indicates a pending lien, but the title lien statement
does not accompany the application for title, the county clerk shall enter into the system of record the
name and address of the lienholder or that a lien is pending. The county clerk shall indicate a title shall
not be issued until either the title lien statement and the required fees are submitted, or in thirty (30)
days, whichever occurs first. The county clerk shall then issue the registration.
(b) After submission of the title lien statement, the county clerk shall enter the date of lien notation and the
notation number into the system of record, enabling the cabinet to record the lien in the system of
record and produce a title.
(6)[(5)] If a certificate of title is issued after the thirty (30) day time window identified in subsection (5)[(4)] of
this section has expired without the notation of a security interest, or if a title has been issued because there
was no provision made for a lien to be noted within thirty (30) days, a secured party wishing to note a security
interest on a title shall submit a title lien statement. The county clerk shall enter the information required by
KRS 186A.190(9) into the system of record and a new certificate of title reflecting the security interest shall be
produced.
(7)[(6)] The fee for the filing of a title lien statement through the electronic title application and registration
system shall be transferred electronically to the county clerk of the county in which the debtor resides.
(8)[(7)] The security interest noted on the certificate of title shall be deemed perfected at the time the security
interest attaches in accordance with KRS 355.9-203 if the secured party submits a properly completed title lien
statement with application for first title or, in the case of property previously titled in the name of the debtor,
within thirty (30) days of attachment. Otherwise, the security interest shall be deemed perfected at the time
that the title lien statement is submitted.
Section 8. KRS 186A.145 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a county clerk shall not process an application for
Kentucky title and registration from or to any Kentucky resident who has a delinquent motor vehicle ad
valorem property tax account.
(2) This section shall not apply to transactions involving:
(a) Licensed Kentucky motor vehicle dealers;
(b) A person who is engaged in the business of storing or towing motor vehicles, applying for a new title
under KRS 376.275(1)(c);
(c) Individuals when the delinquent motor vehicle ad valorem property taxes are owed by a previous
owner who is not a party to the transaction; or
(d)[(c)] A secured party applying for a repossession title under KRS 186.045(6).
(3) (a) For any vehicle obtained as the result of a claim on a motor vehicle insurance policy, an insurer and its
agent shall not be responsible for the payment of any delinquent motor vehicle ad valorem property
taxes owed by any previous owner, when:
1. Applying for a regular or salvage title; or
2. Transferring ownership of the vehicle to another party.
(b) The owner of a motor vehicle that was transferred to an insurer or its agent under paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall remain responsible for any delinquent motor vehicle ad valorem property taxes owed
prior to the transfer.
(4) An insurer shall not be exempt from any motor vehicle ad valorem property taxes owed on any vehicle that it
owns:
(a) As a part of its business operations; or
(b) On January 1, that was obtained as the result of a claim on a motor vehicle insurance policy.
Section 9. KRS 186A.100 is amended to read as follows:

CHAPTER 95 13
(1) A motor vehicle dealer licensed under KRS 186.070 who sells a vehicle for use upon the highways of this state
or another state shall equip the vehicle with a temporary tag executed in the manner prescribed below, which
shall be valid for sixty (60) days from the date the vehicle is delivered to the purchaser. The cost of the tag
shall be two dollars ($2), of which the clerk shall retain one dollar ($1). A motor vehicle dealer licensed under
KRS 186.070 shall apply to the county clerk of the county in which the dealer maintains his or her principal
place of business for issuance of temporary tags. Application shall be made for such tags on forms supplied to
the county clerk by the Transportation Cabinet.
(2) The county clerk of any county who receives a proper application for issuance of temporary tags shall record
the number of each tag issued upon the application of the dealer for temporary[such] tags, or if a group of
consecutively numbered temporary tags are issued to a dealer in connection with a single application, record
the beginning and ending numbers of the group on the application.
(3) The clerk shall retain, for a period of two (2) years, one (1) copy of the dealer's temporary tag application, and
ensure that it reflects the numbers appearing on the tags issued with respect to the[such] application. These
copies may be kept by the county clerk in an electronic format.
(4) If the owner of a motor vehicle submits to the county clerk a properly completed application for Kentucky
certificate of title and registration pursuant to KRS 186A.120, any motor vehicle required to be registered and
titled in Kentucky, that is not currently registered and titled in Kentucky, may be equipped with a temporary
tag, which shall be valid for sixty (60) days from the date of issuance, issued by the county clerk for the
purpose of operating the vehicle in Kentucky while assembling the necessary documents in order to title and
register the vehicle in Kentucky. The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate[establish] administrative
regulations governing this section.
(5) The county clerk may issue a temporary tag to the owner of a motor vehicle that is currently registered and
titled in Kentucky. A temporary tag authorized by this subsection shall be used for emergency or unusual
purposes as determined by the clerk for the purpose of maintaining the owner's current registration. A
temporary tag authorized by this subsection may only be issued by the county clerk and shall be valid for a
period of between twenty-four (24) hours and seven (7) days, as determined is necessary by the clerk. A
county clerk shall not issue a temporary tag authorized by this subsection unless the owner of the motor
vehicle applying for the tag presents proof of motor vehicle insurance pursuant to KRS 304.39-080. [On and
after January 1, 2006, ]If the motor vehicle is a personal motor vehicle as defined in KRS 304.39-087, proof of
insurance shall be determined by the county clerk as provided in KRS 186A.042. A temporary tag issued
pursuant to this subsection shall not be reissued by the county clerk for the same owner and same motor
vehicle within one (1) year of issuance of a temporary tag.
Section 10. KRS 186A.017 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The cabinet shall establish an electronic title application and registration system which allows the submission
of the required forms and signatures electronically in lieu of the paper application process for titles and salvage
titles.
(2) The electronic title application and registration system established under this section shall:
(a) Collect all the necessary information required under KRS 186A.060;
(b) Collect and electronically transmit all fees imposed under KRS 186.040, 186.050, 186.162, and
186A.130, any fees imposed under subsection (7)[(6)] of this section, and the motor vehicle use tax
levied under KRS 138.460;
(c) Accept electronic signatures which satisfy the requirements of KRS 369.101 to 369.120; and
(d) Transmit the information in a secure manner.
(3) An approved entity that wishes to use the electronic title application and registration system shall transmit all
application documents, required electronic signatures, and fees through the system to the county clerk of the
county in which either the purchaser of the vehicle resides or the motor vehicle dealer selling the vehicle is
located.
(4) When[if] the electronic title application and registration system is fully implemented[operational], a county
clerk who receives an application transmitted through the system shall, by 3 p.m. the next business day, either:
(a) Accept the application and forward it to the cabinet; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) Reject the application and return it to the approved entity.
(5) If a county clerk is required to manually enter information from an application into AVIS before
forwarding it to the cabinet, the title application and registration system shall not be considered fully
implemented. The cabinet shall make the determination of whether the title application and registration
system shall be considered fully implemented.
(6)[(4)] An entity that wishes to become an approved entity for the purposes of this chapter shall submit an
application to the cabinet, along with a one hundred fifty dollar ($150) application fee. If approved, the entity
shall pay an annual registration fee to the cabinet. All fees collected under this subsection shall be deposited
into the road fund.
(7)[(5)] The cabinet shall enter into contracts with qualified third-party providers to integrate with AVIS and
other systems to provide software and programs to approved entities to facilitate electronic vehicle
registration, titling, and filing of title lien statements. A third party that contracts with the cabinet under this
section may act on behalf of the cabinet and county clerks in receiving, processing, and transmitting to the
county clerk title and registration applications, salvage title applications, title lien statements, and related
documents and fees.
(8)[(6)] Any agreement with the cabinet and a third-party provider under subsection (7)[(5)] of this section shall
authorize an online transaction fee to be charged by the third-party provider to an approved entity. A motor
vehicle dealer licensed under KRS Chapter 190 who uses the electronic title application and registration
system to file the documentation necessary to obtain a certificate of title, salvage title, or registration for the
purchaser of a vehicle shall collect from the purchaser any fees charged for the transaction by the third-party
provider. The dealer shall remit fees collected under this subsection to the county clerk through the electronic
title application and registration system. Except for salvage title applications, any transaction fee charged
under this subsection shall be listed separately on the buyer's order and identified as "online system filing fee."
(9)[(7)] The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
establish qualifications for approved entities and procedures for the electronic title application and registration
system.
Section 11. KRS 186A.220 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, when any motor vehicle dealer licensed in this state buys or
accepts[ such] a motor vehicle or all-terrain vehicle as defined in KRS 189.010 in trade, which has been
previously registered or titled for use in this or another state, and which the dealer[he] holds for resale, the
dealer[he] shall not be required to obtain a certificate of title for it, but shall, within fifteen (15) days after
acquiring such vehicle, notify the county clerk of the assignment of the motor vehicle to his or her dealership
and pay the required transferor fee.
(2) Upon purchasing[ such] a motor vehicle or all-terrain vehicle, or accepting it in trade, the dealer shall obtain
from the[his] transferor, properly executed, all documents required by KRS 186A.215, to include the odometer
disclosure statement thereon, together with a properly assigned certificate of title.
(3) The dealer shall execute the[his] application for assignment upon documents designated by the Department of
Vehicle Regulation, to the county clerk of the county in which the dealer[he] maintains his or her principal
place of business. The[Such] clerk shall enter the assignment into AVIS[upon the automated system].
(4) The dealer shall retain the properly assigned certificate of title received from the[his] transferor, and may
make any reassignments on the title[thereon] until the forms for dealer assignment on the certificate of title are
exhausted. The Department of Vehicle Regulation may, if it deems it warranted, provide a special document to
allow for additional dealer assignments without requiring system generated documents.
(5) (a) When a dealer assigns the vehicle to a purchaser for use, the dealer[he] shall deliver the properly
assigned certificate of title, and other documents if appropriate, to the[such] purchaser, who shall make
application for registration and a certificate of title[ thereon].
(b) The dealer may, with the consent of the purchaser, deliver the assigned certificate of title, and other
appropriate documents of a new or used vehicle, directly to the county clerk, and on behalf of the
purchaser, make application for registration and a certificate of title. In so doing, the dealer shall require
from the purchaser proof of insurance as mandated by KRS 304.39-080 before delivering possession of
the vehicle.

CHAPTER 95 15
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 186.020, 186A.065, 186A.095, 186A.215, and 186A.300, if a
dealer elects to deliver the title documents to the county clerk and has not received a clear certificate of
title from a prior owner, the dealer shall retain the documents in his or her possession until the
certificate of title is obtained.
(d) When a dealer assigns a vehicle to a purchaser for use under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
transfer and delivery of the vehicle is effective immediately upon the delivery of all necessary legal
documents, or copies thereof, including proof of insurance as mandated by KRS 304.39-080.
(6) The department may make available, upon proper application from a licensed motor vehicle dealer, electronic
means by which the dealer can interface directly with AVIS and the department. If the department grants this
access, all fees currently required for the issuance of a certificate of title shall continue to be charged and
remitted to the appropriate parties as provided by statute.
(7) The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall ensure[assure] that AVIS[the automated system] is capable of
accepting instructions from the county clerk that a certificate of title shall not be produced under a dealer
registration situation.
SECTION 12. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 20 OF KRS CHAPTER 304 IS CREATED TO READ
AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Prior to the effective date of the use of the nationally accepted used car valuation guides or tools identified
under subsection (2) of this section, a property, casualty, or property and casualty insurer shall use any
nationally accepted used car valuation guide or tool available to the insurer when determining the retail
value of a wrecked, destroyed, or damaged motor vehicle under KRS Chapter 186A.
(2) By July 1, 2025, the commissioner shall promulgate an emergency administrative regulation and an
ordinary administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that identifies the nationally
accepted used car valuation guides or tools that are available to, and shall be used by, property, casualty,
and property and casualty insurers when determining the retail value of a wrecked, destroyed, or damaged
motor vehicle under KRS Chapter 186A.
Section 13. KRS 186A.295 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any person or entity having a motor vehicle or trailer that has been destroyed, to the extent that its
repair cannot be obtained through usual commercial repair services, at a cost less than its retail value as
prescribed by a nationally accepted used car valuation guide or tool identified under Section 12 of
this Act[established from a value manual approved by the Department of Revenue], or from which two
(2) or more parts which typically bear a vehicle identification number placed thereon by the
manufacturer have been removed, or which he or she removes, shall surrender the certificate of title for
the[such] vehicle for which he or she has a certificate of title in his, or her, or another name, to the
county clerk of the county in which the[such] vehicle is located. The clerk shall immediately forward
the surrendered title to Frankfort with instructions for canceling the title.
(b) Any person or entity engaged in the sale of used motor vehicle or trailer parts, or the recycling or
salvage of them, shall surrender the certificate of title for any vehicle in his or her possession, and for
which he or she has a certificate of title, whether in his or her or another name, if the[such] vehicle is
destroyed within the meaning of paragraph (a) of this subsection, or from which two (2) or more parts
which typically bear a vehicle identification number placed thereon by a manufacturer have been
removed, or which he or she removes, to the county clerk of the county in which the[such] vehicle is
located. The clerk shall immediately forward the surrendered title to Frankfort with instructions for
canceling the title.
(c) The surrender of the certificate of title pursuant to this section shall be made within ten (10) working
days, next succeeding the day when the[such] vehicle was received, destroyed, or next succeeding the
day during which a[such] second part was removed.
(2) Each county clerk shall receive without charge, a certificate surrendered in accordance with this section,
cancel it, and remit it to the Department of Vehicle Regulation, and take any other action related to it, as
required by the Department of Vehicle Regulation.
Section 14. KRS 186A.520 is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) Except as provided in KRS 186A.555, a salvage title shall be obtained by the owner of a motor vehicle that
meets the following definition of a salvage vehicle:
(a) A vehicle which has been wrecked, destroyed, or damaged, to the extent that the total estimated or
actual cost of parts and labor to rebuild or reconstruct the vehicle to its preaccident condition and for
legal operation on the roads or highways, not including the cost of parts and labor to reinstall a
deployed airbag system, exceeds seventy-five percent (75%) of the retail value of the vehicle, as
prescribed by a nationally accepted used car valuation guide or tool identified under Section 12 of this
Act[by the Department of Revenue by administrative regulation].
(b) The value of repair parts for purposes of this definition shall be determined by using the current
published retail cost of the parts equal in kind and quality to the parts to be replaced or the actual retail
cost of the repair parts used in repair.
(c) The labor costs of repairs for purposes of this section shall be computed by using the hourly labor rate
and time allocations which are reasonable and customary in the automobile repair industry in the
community where the repairs are performed.
(d) Airbag reinstallation costs which are excluded from the seventy-five percent (75%) computation as set
forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be included by an insurer in the computation of the total
physical damage estimate according to the terms and conditions of individual policies, provided that the
total costs payable by an insurer do not exceed the total retail value of the vehicle.
(2) The owner or an authorized agent of a motor vehicle that meets the definition of a salvage vehicle as set forth
in subsection (1) of this section shall, within fifteen (15) days from the receipt of all necessary paperwork
required by this chapter, submit an application to the county clerk, on a form prescribed by the Department of
Vehicle Regulation, for a salvage title, accompanied by a properly endorsed certificate of title and any lien
satisfactions, if any appear, as may be required.
(3) The county clerk shall retain a copy of each salvage title application received and shall forward the original
and its supporting documents to the Department of Vehicle Regulation in a manner similar to that for handling
of an application for a title.
(4) The county clerk shall rely on the information provided by the owner or authorized agent, including a county
of residence designation, on:
(a) Any approved, notarized state form utilized in lien titling or the title transfer process signed by the
owner or authorized agent; and
(b) Any document submitted during the transfer of a salvage vehicle from an owner to an insurer.
Reliance on the foregoing by the county clerk shall relieve the office of the county clerk from liability to any
third party claiming failure to comply with this section.
(5) The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall process the salvage title application in a manner similar to that
used in processing a title application and the salvage title shall be delivered in a like manner of a title. Salvage
titles shall be construed as proof of ownership of a vehicle in a state as to be unusable upon the highways of
the Commonwealth.
(6) A vehicle shall not be issued a registration for highway use as long as a salvage title is in force. The only time
a vehicle with a salvage title may be operated upon the highways of the Commonwealth is when it is in route
to or from an inspection by the certified inspector prior to obtaining a certificate of title after having been
rebuilt as per KRS 186.115.
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 369.103, when a salvage vehicle is transferred from an owner to an
insurer, the following shall be exempted from the requirements of notarization, including exemption from the
notarization of electronic signature requirements of KRS Chapter 423:
(a) The transfer of ownership on the certificate of title;
(b) Any power of attorney required in connection with the transfer of ownership to the insurer;
(c) Any required odometer disclosure statement;
(d) The application for a salvage certificate of title; and
(e) The transfer of ownership on the salvage certificate of title issued.

CHAPTER 95 17
(8) Subsections (2) to (5) of this section shall not apply to applications for salvage title using the electronic title
application and registration system established under KRS 186A.017.
Section 15. KRS 186A.530 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The owner of a motor vehicle that meets the definition of a salvage vehicle as set forth in KRS 186A.520(1)
and has been issued a salvage certificate of title in Kentucky, or the equivalent thereof by another licensing
jurisdiction, and has been rebuilt, may make application for a new certificate of title pursuant to KRS 186.115.
The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A
governing the form of application.
(2) Upon receipt of a salvage certificate of title issued pursuant to KRS 186A.520, or similar title issued by
another state if the title does not disqualify the vehicle from being titled for use on the highway in that state,
and proof of passing the inspection required by KRS 186A.115, the cabinet shall issue a new certificate of title
with the words "rebuilt vehicle" printed on the face of the title. The brand shall be carried forward and printed
in the appropriate section on the face of all titles issued thereafter for that motor vehicle.
(3) If ownership of a motor vehicle has been transferred to an insurance company through payment of damages,
the insurance company making the payment of damages shall be deemed the owner of the vehicle.
(4) The owner of a water damaged vehicle shall make application to the cabinet for a salvage certificate of title as
provided for in KRS 186A.520. The owner of a vehicle with a brand from another jurisdiction identifying the
vehicle as water damaged or other similar designation who is making application for a Kentucky title shall be
issued a title with the words "water damaged" printed on the face of the title.
(5) A Kentucky salvage certificate of title may be issued from an out-of-state junking certificate or other
ownership document bearing a designation of "junk," "unrebuildable," or other similar classification that
disqualifies the vehicle from being titled for use on the highway in that state with the following provisions:
(a) The out-of-state junking certificate of title or other ownership certificate shall be an original, secure
document.
(b) The applicant shall submit a minimum of two (2) photographs of the motor vehicle showing the damage
to the motor vehicle. The photographs shall be included in the application for a salvage certificate of
title.
(c) The applicant shall submit a minimum of two (2) estimates of damage verifying that the condition of
the vehicle which has been issued the junking certificate constitutes less than seventy-five percent
(75%) of the retail value of the vehicle, as prescribed by a nationally accepted used car valuation
guide or tool identified under Section 12 of this Act[set forth in a current edition of the National Auto
Dealers' Association N.A.D.A. price guide].
(d) A salvage title issued under this subsection shall be branded "SALVAGE." The Transportation Cabinet
shall use a unique method of identification to differentiate a salvage title issued under this subsection
from other salvage titles.
(6) (a) Upon receipt of a salvage certificate of title issued pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, or an out-
of-state junking certificate or other ownership document bearing a designation of "junk,"
"unrebuildable," or other similar classification that disqualifies the vehicle from being titled for use on
the highway in that state, and proof of passing the inspection required by KRS 186A.115, the cabinet
shall issue a new certificate of title with the words "REBUILT VEHICLE" printed on the face of the
title. The Transportation Cabinet shall use a unique method of identification to differentiate a rebuilt
brand issued under this paragraph from other rebuilt brands. The brand shall be carried forward and
printed in the appropriate section on the face of all titles issued thereafter for that motor vehicle.
(b) A person who obtains a rebuilt title under this subsection shall permanently affix a plate of metallic
composition within the opening for the driver's side door which states "REBUILT VEHICLE - May Not
Be Eligible For Title In All States."
(7) (a) When an insurance company makes a claim settlement on a vehicle that has been stolen and recovered,
if the vehicle meets the definition of a salvage vehicle as set forth in KRS 186A.520, the company shall
apply for a salvage certificate of title as provided for in KRS 186A.520. Upon receipt of this
information, the cabinet shall issue the company a certificate of title to replace a salvage certificate of
title. The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A regarding
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

18 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
the forms and any additional information which insurance companies shall be required to obtain and
submit when seeking a certificate of title to replace a salvage certificate of title.
(b) In claim settlements that do not involve transfer of the vehicle to the insurance company, an insurer
shall not render payment on a damage claim for a vehicle whose damage meets or exceeds seventy-five
percent (75%) of the value of the vehicle, until the insurer has received proof that the owner has
surrendered the title or has applied for a salvage certificate of title as set forth in KRS 186A.520. The
owner shall apply for a salvage certificate of title within three (3) working days of the agreed
settlement. This subsection shall not apply to hail-damaged vehicles under KRS 186A.555.
(c) An insurance company shall not refuse coverage to, and shall not reclassify coverage of, a vehicle that
has been issued a rebuilt title pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(8) A motor vehicle owner or a motor vehicle dealer licensed in this state who offers for sale, trade, or transfer a
motor vehicle which carries a title brand, as set forth in subsection (2) or (6) of this section, shall disclose the
nature of the brand to any prospective buyer or transferee, prior to the sale, and according to the following:
(a) Dealer disclosure shall be located on a sticker placed on the vehicle. The sticker wording shall be
printed in at least ten (10) point, bold face type, on a background of obviously different color, and shall
include the following: "THIS IS A REBUILT VEHICLE." This disclosure information shall not appear
on vehicles that do not have a branded title. Dealer disclosure shall also be located on a buyer's
notification form to be approved by the Transportation Cabinet. The form shall inform the buyer that
the vehicle is a rebuilt vehicle and may include any other information the cabinet deems necessary.
(b) Nondealer disclosure shall be made in accordance with the procedures provided for in KRS 186A.060.
The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall ensure that disclosure information appears near the
beginning of the application for title and informs the buyer that the vehicle is a rebuilt vehicle.
(9) Failure of a dealer to procure the buyer's acknowledgment signature on the buyer's notification form or failure
of any person other than a dealer to procure the buyer's acknowledgment signature on the vehicle transaction
record form shall render the sale voidable at the election of the buyer. The election to render the sale voidable
shall be limited to forty-five (45) days after issuance of the title. This provision shall not bar any other
remedies otherwise available to the purchaser.
(10) The notification provisions of this section shall not apply to motor vehicles more than ten (10) model years
old.
(11) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A,
regarding the administration of the title branding procedure. The administrative regulations shall include the
manner in which salvage titles and rebuilt brands on vehicles previously declared unrebuildable by another
state are differentiated from other salvage titles and rebuilt brands. The administrative regulations may include
designation of additional brands which provide significant information to the owner.
Section 16. KRS 186A.555 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of KRS 186A.500 to 186A.550 notwithstanding, the owner of a motor vehicle that has been
damaged solely by hail shall have the regular title of the vehicle branded as follows "Hail Damage" if:
(a) The vehicle is in a condition that it can be legally operated on the highway;
(b) The total estimated or actual cost of parts and labor to rebuild or reconstruct the vehicle to its pre-hail
condition exceeds seventy-five percent (75%) of the retail value of the vehicle, as prescribed by a
nationally accepted used car valuation guide or tool identified under Section 12 of this Act[by the
Department of Revenue by administrative regulation]; and
(c) The owner intends to retain ownership of the vehicle.
(2) A person seeking to have the title of a vehicle branded for hail damage under subsection (1) of this section
shall present the sheriff with a statement from the person's insurance company that the damage exceeds
seventy-five percent (75%) of the retail value of the vehicle and is solely the result of hail damage, and shall
have the vehicle inspected by the sheriff of the county in which the vehicle is registered. Upon completion of
inspection of the vehicle, the sheriff shall indicate on the vehicle transaction record form if he or she has
received a statement from the person's insurance company that the damage to the vehicle is the result of hail
damage and if the total estimated or actual cost of parts and labor to rebuild or reconstruct the vehicle to its
pre-hail condition exceeds seventy-five percent (75%) of the retail value of the vehicle, as prescribed by a
nationally accepted used car valuation guide or tool identified under Section 12 of this Act[by the Department

CHAPTER 95 19
of Revenue by administrative regulation]. The sheriff shall be paid a fee of five dollars ($5) to conduct an
inspection under this subsection.
(3) Upon completion of the inspection required under subsection (2) of this section, a person shall take the vehicle
transaction record form and the title to the vehicle to the office of the county clerk in the county in which the
vehicle is registered. If the sheriff has certified on the vehicle transaction record form that the damage to the
vehicle is the result of hail damage and if the total estimated or actual cost of parts and labor to rebuild or
reconstruct the vehicle to its pre-hail condition exceeds seventy-five percent (75%) of the retail value of the
vehicle, as prescribed by a nationally accepted used car valuation guide or tool identified under Section 12 of
this Act[by the Department of Revenue by administrative regulation], the title shall not be surrendered to the
clerk, but the clerk shall stamp on the face of the title "Hail Damage". The clerk shall also enter into the
Automated Motor Vehicle Registration System (AVIS) the information that the title has been branded in the
clerk's office "Hail Damage". The county clerk shall be paid a fee of three dollars ($3) to carry out the
provisions of this subsection.
(4) A title branded "Hail Damage" under the provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall retain the brand for
as long as the person holds title to the vehicle, and upon the sale or transfer of the vehicle, the new title issued
shall continue to carry the brand "Hail Damage".
(5) An insurance company shall not render payment on a vehicle damaged solely by hail in excess of seventy-five
percent (75%) of the retail value of the vehicle until the title has been branded "Hail Damage".
Section 17. KRS 186.403 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Transportation Cabinet shall develop a system of issuing voluntary travel ID instruction permits,
operator's licenses, commercial driver's licenses, and personal identification cards.
(2) The development of the system identified in subsection (1) of this section shall include but not be limited to
the:
(a) Acquisition of equipment and information technology systems and services;
(b) Modification, conversion, or upgrade of the cabinet's existing databases, equipment, and information
technology systems;
(c) Establishment of electronic connectivity with any other state's driver licensing department, federal
agency, national or regional association, or business. Electronic connectivity under this paragraph shall
be limited to the sharing of the minimum amount of information necessary to validate information
supplied by an applicant, process the application, and produce and distribute the identity document. The
Transportation Cabinet shall limit any access to the databases developed under this chapter in
accordance with the Driver's Privacy Protection Act, 18 U.S.C. sec. 2721;
(d) Creation of a new design for operator's licenses, commercial driver's licenses, instruction permits, and
personal identification cards that will meet the minimum content, design, and security standards
required under this section;
(e) Collection, management, and retention of personal information and identity documents; and
(f) Development and implementation of a comprehensive security plan to ensure the security and integrity
of the department's:
1. Employees;
2. Facilities;
3. Storage systems;
4. Production of operator's licenses, commercial driver's licenses, instruction permits, and personal
identification cards; and
5. Collection and retention of personal information and identity documents.
(3) A person who[On or after January 1, 2019]:
(a) [A person who ]Applies for an initial Kentucky instruction permit, operator's license, or personal
identification card under KRS 186.412 or[, 186.4121,] 186.4122[, or 186.4123], including any person
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

20 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
who establishes residency in the state, may apply for either a voluntary travel ID or a standard
instruction permit, operator's license, or personal identification card;
(b) [A person who ]Applies for the renewal of an instruction permit, operator's license, or personal
identification card under KRS 186.412, 186.4121, 186.4122, or 186.4123 may apply for either a
voluntary travel ID or a standard instruction permit, operator's license, or personal identification card;
(c) 1. Meets the minimum requirements for federal recognition in Section 202 of the REAL ID ACT
of 2005, as amended, in 49 U.S.C. sec. 30301 note;
2. Has been admitted to the United States as a nonimmigrant pursuant to a compact of free
association between the United States and the Republic of the Marshall Islands, the Republic
of Palau, or the Federated States of Micronesia; and
3. Applies for an initial or renewal operator's license or personal identification card under
Section 18 or 20 of this Act;
may apply for either a voluntary travel ID or a standard instruction permit, operator's license, or
personal identification card; and
(d) [(c) A person who ]Holds a voluntary travel ID operator's license, and applies for and passes all
necessary examinations for a commercial driver's license under KRS Chapter 281A, shall receive a
voluntary travel ID commercial driver's license. This paragraph shall not apply to a person who is not a
citizen or permanent resident of the United States.
(4) The fees for initial, renewal, duplicate, or corrected voluntary travel ID or standard operator's licenses,
instruction permits, or personal identification cards shall be as set forth under KRS 186.531.
(5) A voluntary travel ID identity document issued by the cabinet may be used for all state purposes authorized for
identity documents otherwise issued under KRS 186.400 to 186.640 and Chapter 281A.
(6) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A that set
standards for the establishment of a voluntary travel ID identity document system, including but not limited to
the components of the system identified in subsection (2) of this section.
Section 18. KRS 186.412 (Effective July 1, 2025) is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "applicant" means a person who:
(a) Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States; or
(b) Meets the minimum requirements for federal recognition in Section 202 of the REAL ID ACT of
2005, as amended, in 49 U.S.C. sec. 30301 note, and has been admitted to the United States as a
nonimmigrant pursuant to a compact of free association between the United States and the Republic
of the Marshall Islands, the Republic of Palau, or the Federated States of Micronesia.
(2) An applicant shall apply for an instruction permit or operator's license with the Transportation Cabinet, or
through alternative technology. Except as provided in KRS 186.417, the application form shall require the
applicant's:
(a) Full legal name and signature;
(b) Date of birth;
(c) Social Security number or a letter from the Social Security Administration declining to issue a Social
Security number;
(d) Sex;
(e) Present Kentucky resident address, exclusive of a post office box address alone;
(f) Other information necessary to permit the application of United States citizens to also serve as an
application for voter registration;
(g) A brief physical description of the applicant;
(h) Proof of the applicant's Kentucky residency, including but not limited to a deed or property tax bill,
utility agreement or utility bill, or rental housing agreement; and

CHAPTER 95 21
(i) Other information the cabinet may require by administrative regulation promulgated under KRS
Chapter 13A.
(3) (a) To satisfy the requirements of subsection (2)(e) and (h) of this section, an applicant seeking to obtain a
renewal or duplicate operator's license may use a completed form attesting to the lack of an established
and fixed nighttime residence of regular return as established in accordance with paragraph (b) of this
subsection. The form developed under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall not be used by an applicant
for an initial operator's license or instruction permit.
(b) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
develop forms and procedures whereby an applicant for a renewal or duplicate operator's license under
this section or KRS 186.4121, or an applicant for an initial, renewal, or duplicate personal identification
card under KRS 186.4122 or 186.4123, who does not have an established and fixed nighttime residence
of regular return may use as proof of residency, a form, attested to by a homeless shelter, health care
facility, or social service agency currently providing the applicant treatment or services, that the
applicant is a resident of Kentucky. An applicant who does not have an established and fixed nighttime
residence of regular return shall not be issued a voluntary travel ID operator's license under this section
or KRS 186.4121.
(4) In addition to the information identified in subsection (2) of this section, a:
(a) Permanent resident shall present one (1) of the following documents issued by the United States
Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services:
1.[(a)] An I-551 card with a photograph of the applicant; or
2.[(b)] A form with the photograph of the applicant or a passport with a photograph of the applicant on
which the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship
and Immigration Services, has stamped the following: "Processed for I-551. Temporary evidence
of lawful admission for permanent residence. Valid until .... (Expiration Date). Employment
authorized."; and
(b) Person who meets the definition in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall present a valid, unexpired
passport from his or her country of origin, along with one (1) of the following documents issued by
the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and
Immigration Services:
1. Form I-94, Arrival/Departure Record number;
2. Form I-766, Employment Authorization Document number; or
3. Form I-797, Notice of Action receipt number.
(5) Upon application for an operator's license under this section, the cabinet shall capture a photograph of the
applicant in accordance with the requirements of KRS 186.4102(1).
(6) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the cabinet shall electronically scan the
documents required for application under this section and shall electronically retain the application,
supporting documents, and the photograph of the applicant. Upon completion of any required
examinations under KRS 186.480, the cabinet shall present the applicant with a temporary operator's
license or instruction permit, which shall be valid for thirty (30) days until a permanent operator's
license or instruction permit is mailed to the applicant by the Transportation Cabinet.
(b) The cabinet shall only electronically scan the birth certificate of an individual applying for a voluntary
travel ID instruction permit or operator's license. If the applicant is not seeking such a permit or license,
the cabinet shall not electronically scan the applicant's birth certificate.
(c) An applicant for an operator's license or instruction permit shall not be required to surrender the
applicant's birth certificate for image capture, image storage, or image transmission to any entity,
including the federal government, unless express consent is given by the applicant during the course of
obtaining a voluntary travel ID license or permit.
(7) An applicant shall swear an oath to the cabinet as to the truthfulness of the statements contained in the form.
Section 19. KRS 186.4121 is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

22 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) As used in this section, "applicant" means a person who:
(a) Is not a United States citizen;
(b) [ and ]Has not been granted status as a permanent resident of the United States; and
(c) Does not meet the minimum requirements for federal recognition in Section 202 of the REAL ID
ACT of 2005, as amended, in 49 U.S.C. sec. 30301 note, and has not been admitted to the United
States as a nonimmigrant pursuant to a compact of free association between the United States and
the Republic of the Marshall Islands, the Republic of Palau, or the Federated States of Micronesia.
(2) An applicant shall apply for an instruction permit or operator's license to either the Transportation Cabinet in
Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office. An applicant under this section shall complete the
application identified in KRS 186.412, along with other documents required under this section. The cabinet
shall keep an electronic copy of the documentation submitted with the application and shall capture a
photograph of the applicant in accordance with KRS 186.4102(1)
(3) The application form under this section shall be accompanied by the applicant's documentation issued by the
United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration
Services, authorizing the person to be in the United States and, if applicable, the applicant's international
driving permit. The Transportation Cabinet shall verify the information submitted under this subsection
through the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements (SAVE) program.
(4) The application form of a special status individual with a K-1 status shall be accompanied by an original or
certified copy of the applicant's completed marriage license signed by the official who presided over the
marriage ceremony and two (2) witnesses. The application form of a special status individual with a K-1 status
shall also include the applicant's petition to enter the United States for the purpose of marriage that contains
the name of the prospective spouse. If the name of the prospective spouse on the petition does not match the
name of the spouse on the marriage license, the Transportation Cabinet shall not be required to issue an
operator's license.
(5) (a) The Transportation Cabinet shall verify and validate the immigration status and personal identity of an
applicant under this section through federal government systems and databases.
(b) If an applicant's identity and immigration status is validated, the cabinet shall capture a photograph of
the applicant, and scan the required documents into the cabinet's database.
(c) If the applicant successfully completes any examinations required under KRS 186.480, or if an
examination is not required, the Transportation Cabinet shall present the applicant with a temporary
operator's license or instruction permit, which shall be valid for thirty (30) days until a permanent
operator's license or instruction permit is mailed to the applicant.
(d) An applicant under this section shall only be issued a standard operator's license or instruction permit.
(6) (a) An applicant shall apply to renew an operator's license, or obtain a duplicate operator's license, at the
Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office.
(b) If an applicant has any type of change in his or her immigration status, the applicant shall apply to
update the operator's license with either the Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation
Cabinet field office within ten (10) days.
(7) An applicant shall swear an oath to the Transportation Cabinet as to the truthfulness of the statements
contained in the form.
(8) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an initial or renewal operator's license issued to
an applicant who is not a special status individual shall be valid for a period equal to the length of time
the applicant's documentation from the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States
Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, is valid, or eight (8) years, whichever time period is
shorter.
(b) An initial or renewal operator's license shall be valid for a period of one (1) year if the applicant is not a
special status individual and the person's documentation issued by the United States Department of
Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, is issued for an
indefinite period of time and does not have an expiration date. The fee shall be the same as for a regular
operator's license.
Section 20. KRS 186.4122 is amended to read as follows:

CHAPTER 95 23
(1) As used in this section, "applicant" means a person who:
(a) Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States; or
(b) Meets the minimum requirements for federal recognition in Section 202 of the REAL ID ACT of
2005, as amended, in 49 U.S.C. sec. 30301 note, and has been admitted to the United States as a
nonimmigrant pursuant to a compact of free association between the United States and the Republic
of the Marshall Islands, the Republic of Palau, or the Federated States of Micronesia.
(2) The Transportation Cabinet shall issue a personal identification card to an applicant who:
(a) Is a Kentucky resident;
(b) Applies in person to the cabinet or through alternative technology; and
(c) Complies with the provisions of this section.
(3) Upon application for a personal identification card under this section, the cabinet shall capture a photograph of
the applicant in accordance with KRS 186.4102(1).
(4) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the cabinet shall electronically scan the
documents required for application under this section and shall electronically retain the application,
supporting documents, and the photograph of the applicant. The cabinet shall present the applicant with
a temporary personal identification card, which shall be valid for thirty (30) days until a permanent
personal identification card is mailed to the applicant by the Transportation Cabinet.
(b) The cabinet shall only electronically scan the birth certificate of an individual applying for a voluntary
travel ID personal identification card. If the applicant is not seeking such a document, the cabinet shall
not electronically scan the applicant's birth certificate.
(c) An applicant for a personal identification card shall not be required to surrender the applicant's birth
certificate for image capture, image storage, or image transmission to any entity, including the federal
government, unless express consent is given by the applicant during the course of obtaining a voluntary
travel ID personal identification card.
(5) (a) An application for a personal identification card shall be accompanied by the same information as is
required for an operator's license under KRS 186.412, except if an applicant does not have an
established and fixed nighttime residence of regular return, the applicant may:
1. Until July 1, 2025, use as proof of residency a signed letter from a homeless shelter, health care
facility, or social service agency currently providing the applicant treatment or services and
attesting that the applicant is a resident of Kentucky; or
2. On or after July 1, 2025, follow the procedures outlined in KRS 186.412(3).
(b) An applicant who does not have an established and fixed nighttime residence of regular return shall not
be issued a voluntary travel ID personal identification card.
(c) An applicant for a personal identification card who is at least sixteen (16) years of age but less than
eighteen (18) years of age shall not be required to obtain a signature of a parent or legal guardian on the
application if the applicant has been verified as a homeless child or youth, as defined in 42 U.S.C. sec.
11434a(2), by at least one (1) of the following:
1. A director or designee of a governmental or nonprofit agency that receives public or private
funding to provide services to homeless people;
2. A local educational agency liaison for homeless children and youths designated pursuant to 42
U.S.C. sec. 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii), or a school social worker or school counselor;
3. The director or director's designee of a federal TRIO Program or a Gaining Early Awareness and
Readiness for Undergraduate Program; or
4. A financial aid administrator for an institution of higher education.
(d) It shall be permissible for the application form for a personal identification card to include as an
applicant's most current resident address a mailing address or an address provided on a voter
registration card.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

24 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(e) If the applicant is not the legal owner or possessor of the address provided on the application form, the
applicant shall swear that he or she has permission from the legal owner, authorized agent for the legal
owner, or possessor to use the address for purposes of obtaining the personal identification card.
(6) (a) Every applicant for a personal identification card under this section shall swear an oath to the cabinet as
to the truthfulness of the statements contained on the application form.
(b) A personal identification card may be suspended or revoked if the person who was issued the card
presents false or misleading information to the cabinet when applying for the card.
(7) A personal identification card issued under this section shall be valid for a period of eight (8) years from the
date of issuance, except that if the personal identification card is issued to a person who does not have an
established and fixed nighttime residence of regular return, then the personal identification card shall be valid
for one (1) year from the date of issuance.
(8) (a) An applicant shall not be issued a personal identification card if the applicant currently holds a valid
Kentucky instruction permit or operator's license. A person shall not hold more than one (1) license or
personal identification card.
(b) If a person's instruction permit or operator's license has been suspended or revoked, the person may be
issued a personal identification card. A personal identification card shall be surrendered when the
person applies to have his or her instruction permit or operator's license reinstated.
Section 21. KRS 186.4123 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "applicant" means a person who:
(a) Is not a United States citizen;
(b) [ and ]Has not been granted status as a permanent resident of the United States; and
(c) Does not meet the minimum requirements for federal recognition in Section 202 of the REAL ID
ACT of 2005, as amended, in 49 U.S.C. sec. 30301 note, and has not been admitted to the United
States as a nonimmigrant pursuant to a compact of free association between the United States and
the Republic of the Marshall Islands, the Republic of Palau, or the Federated States of Micronesia.
(2) The Transportation Cabinet shall issue a personal identification card to an applicant who:
(a) Is a Kentucky resident;
(b) Applies in person to either the Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field
office; and
(c) Complies with the provisions of this section.
(3) Upon application for a personal identification card under this section, the cabinet shall capture a photograph of
the applicant in accordance with KRS 186.4102(1).
(4) The cabinet shall electronically scan the documents required for application under this section, supporting
documents, and the photograph of the applicant into the cabinet's database.
(5) (a) An application for a personal identification card shall be accompanied by the same information as is
required for an operator's license under KRS 186.412, along with other documents required under this
section, except if an applicant does not have an established and fixed nighttime residence of regular
return, the applicant may:
1. Until July 1, 2025, use as proof of residency a signed letter from a homeless shelter, health care
facility, or social service agency currently providing the applicant treatment or services and
attesting that the applicant is a resident of Kentucky; or
2. On or after July 1, 2025, follow the procedures outlined in KRS 186.412(3).
(b) An applicant who does not have an established and fixed nighttime residence of regular return shall not
be issued a voluntary travel ID personal identification card.
(c) It shall be permissible for the application form for a personal identification card to include as an
applicant's most current resident address a mailing address or an address provided on a voter
registration card.

CHAPTER 95 25
(d) If the applicant is not the legal owner or possessor of the address provided on the application form, the
applicant shall swear that he or she has permission from the legal owner, authorized agent for the legal
owner, or possessor to use the address for purposes of obtaining the personal identification card.
(6) The application form under this section shall be accompanied by the applicant's documentation issued by the
United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration
Services, authorizing the applicant to be in the United States. The Transportation Cabinet shall verify the
information submitted under this subsection through the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements
(SAVE) program.
(7) The application form of a special status individual with a K-1 status shall be accompanied by an original or
certified copy of the applicant's completed marriage license signed by the official who presided over the
marriage ceremony and two (2) witnesses. The application form of a special status individual with a K-1 status
shall also include the applicant's petition to enter the United States for the purpose of marriage that contains
the name of the prospective spouse. If the name of the prospective spouse on the petition does not match the
name of the spouse on the marriage license, the Transportation Cabinet shall not be required to issue an
operator's license.
(8) (a) The Transportation Cabinet shall verify and validate the immigration status and personal identity of an
applicant under this section through federal government systems and databases.
(b) If an applicant's identity and immigration status is validated, the cabinet shall capture a photograph of
the applicant, scan the required documents into the cabinet's database, and present the applicant with a
temporary personal identification card, which shall be valid for thirty (30) days until a permanent
personal identification card is mailed to the applicant.
(c) An applicant under this section shall only be issued a standard personal identification card.
(9) (a) An applicant shall apply to renew a personal identification card, or obtain a duplicate personal
identification card, at the Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office.
(b) If a person has any type of change in his or her immigration status, the person shall apply to update with
either the Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office within ten (10)
days.
(10) (a) Every applicant for a personal identification card under this section shall swear an oath to the
Transportation Cabinet as to the truthfulness of the statements contained on the application form.
(b) A personal identification card may be suspended or revoked if the person who was issued the card
presents false or misleading information to the cabinet when applying for the card.
(11) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an initial or renewal personal identification card
issued to an applicant who is not a special status individual shall be valid for a period equal to the
length of time the applicant's documentation from the United States Department of Homeland Security,
United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, is valid, or eight (8) years, whichever
time period is shorter.
(b) A personal identification card shall be valid for a period of one (1) year if:
1. The applicant is not a special status individual and the applicant's documentation issued by the
United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and
Immigration Services, is issued for an indefinite period of time and does not have an expiration
date. The fee shall be the same as for a regular personal identification card; or
2. The personal identification card is issued to a person who does not have an established and fixed
nighttime residence of regular return.
Section 22. KRS 186.4125 is amended to read as follows:
In order to apply for a voluntary travel ID identity document under KRS 186.403, the applicant shall present:
(1) The applicant's certified birth certificate;
(2) [or ]A valid, unexpired, United States passport or Permanent Resident Card (Form I-551); or
(3) For persons who meet the definition of subsection (1)(b) of Section 18 of this Act, a valid, unexpired
passport from his or her country of origin, along with one (1) of the following documents issued by the
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

26 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration
Services:
(a) Form I-94, Arrival/Departure Record number;
(b) Form I-766, Employment Authorization Document number; or
(c) Form I-797, Notice of Action receipt number.
Section 23. KRS 186.456 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "state police" means the Department of Kentucky State Police.
(2) From September 1, 2024, until June 30, 2026, the state police shall operate a pilot program to provide
operator's license skills testing in up to ten (10)[five (5)] counties in which the state police does not provide
permanent, full-time, driver licensing testing.
(3) In administering the pilot project under this section, the state police shall:
(a) Identify the counties participating in the pilot project based on both public demand and available state
police resources;
(b) Provide testing in each county at least one (1) time[two (2) times] each month;
(c) Accept applications for testing slots through the state police's online application portal;
(d) Limit testing only to residents of the pilot project county where the test will be administered;
(e) Limit testing only to applicants for an intermediate license under KRS 186.452; and
(f) Evaluate service levels, unsubscribed appointments, and no-shows during the term of the pilot project
and, if necessary, move the pilot project to another county identified in subsection (2) of this section,
while maintaining the pilot project in up to ten (10)[at least five (5)] counties during the term of the
project.
(4) The state police shall collect data on testing done under this section and, by October 31, 2025, submit a report
to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Transportation
providing:
(a) Counts of the number of available testing appointments in each county, applicants served, unclaimed
testing slots, and no-show appointments;
(b) Information regarding how the pilot program affected testing associated with regional licensing offices;
and
(c) Recommendations on the continuation or expansion of the pilot project.
Section 24. KRS 235.130 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] person acting for himself, herself, or another shall not buy or trade for any motorboat without receiving
the certificate of title issued for that boat with a certificate of transfer endorsed thereon. If the motorboat has
not been issued a certificate of title as noted on the certificate of registration, a county clerk may accept an
affidavit of ownership to process the application for title. The person shall receive a completed assignment of
title on a boat transaction record and the certificate of registration.
(2) It shall be the duty of the purchaser to promptly submit the endorsed certificate of title or boat transaction
record and certificate of registration to the county clerk of the county of the purchaser's residence or in which
the motorboat is to be principally operated. The purchaser shall apply for a new certificate of title and
registration pursuant to KRS 235.050. The county clerk shall[ thereupon] issue to the purchaser a transfer of
registration bearing the same data and information. The clerk shall forward the endorsed certificate of title or
boat transaction record and certificate of registration and new application for title and registration to the
Transportation Cabinet. Except when registration is prohibited by law, any unexpired registration shall remain
valid after transfer until expiration occurs according to law.
(3) For transferring the registration, the clerk shall collect a fee of five dollars ($5). The clerk shall retain two
dollars ($2), the Transportation Cabinet shall receive two dollars ($2) and the Department of Fish and Wildlife
Resources administratively attached to the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall receive one dollar ($1).
The fee received by the Transportation Cabinet shall be deposited in a trust and agency account for use by the

CHAPTER 95 27
Transportation Cabinet in defraying the cost of implementing and operating the boat titling and registration
program. The fee for transferring the title shall be as required by KRS 235.085.
(4) If a transferee does not promptly submit the necessary documents to the county clerk as required by law in
order to complete the transfer transaction, a transferor may submit to the county clerk, after the passage of
fifteen (15) calendar days, in his or her county of residence, an affidavit that he or she has transferred his or
her interest in a specific motorboat and the clerk may enter appropriate data into the AVIS system which
would restrict any registration transaction from occurring on that vehicle until the transfer was processed.
(5) If the owner junks or otherwise renders a motorboat unfit for future use, he or she shall deliver the title to the
county clerk of the county in which the motorboat is junked. The county clerk shall immediately return the
title to the Transportation Cabinet. The owner shall pay to the county clerk fifty cents ($0.50) for his or her
services.
SECTION 25. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 186A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, on and after July 1, 2026, a lienholder shall participate
in the electronic title application and registration system to confirm, release, and manage liens and lien
documents.
(2) This section shall not apply to lienholders who are not normally engaged in the business of financing motor
vehicles or who are granted an exemption by the cabinet.
Section 26. The following KRS section is repealed:
186A.165 County clerk to complete transmittal record -- Exceptions.
Section 27. Sections 17 to 22 of this Act take effect July 1, 2025.
Section 28. Whereas there is a need for motor vehicle insurers to use nationally accepted used car
valuation or tools to correctly determine the retail value of wrecked, destroyed, or damaged motor vehicles, an
emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 12 to 16 of this Act take effect upon its passage and approval by the
Governor or upon it otherwise becoming a law.
Became law without Governor's signature March 27, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version